Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-708
Appraisers; oath.

The appraisers shall, before entering on their duties, take and subscribe an oath that they will support the Constitutions of the United States and of the State of Nebraska, and will faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as required by law.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 8, p. 454.